Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-4112
Appointment of Public Guardian as
guardian or conservator.

A court may order appointment of the Public Guardian as
a guardian or conservator only after notice to the Public Guardian and a determination
that the appointment or order is necessary and will not result in the Public
Guardian having more appointments than permitted by section 30-4115. The determination
of necessity may require the court to ascertain whether there is any other
alternative to public guardianship or public conservatorship.

Laws 2014, LB920, § 12.